Utah statutes.
13-23-5.   Registration -- Bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit
required -- Penalties.
(1) (a) (i)  It is unlawful for any health spa facility to operate in this
state unless the facility is registered with the division.
(ii)  Registration is effective for one year.  If the health spa facility
renews its registration, the registration shall be renewed at least 30 days
prior to its expiration.
(iii)  The division shall provide by rule for the form, content, application
process, and renewal process of the registration.
(b)  Each health spa registering in this state shall designate a registered
agent for receiving service of process. The registered agent shall be
reasonably available from 8 a.m. until 5 p.m. during normal working days.
(c)  The division shall charge and collect a fee for registration under
guidelines provided in Section 63J-1-504.
(d)  If an applicant fails to file a registration application or renewal by
the due date, or files an incomplete registration application or renewal, the
applicant shall pay a fee of $25 for each month or part of a month after the
date on which the registration application or renewal were due to be filed, in
addition to the registration fee described in Subsection (1)(c).
(2) (a)  Each health spa shall obtain and maintain:
(i)  a performance bond issued by a surety authorized to transact surety
business in this state;
(ii)  an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution
authorized to do business in this state; or
(iii)  a certificate of deposit.
(b)  The bond, letter of credit, or certificate of deposit shall be payable to
the division for the benefit of any consumer who incurs damages as the result
of:
(i)  the health spa's violation of this chapter; or
(ii)  the health spa's going out of business or relocating and failing to
offer an alternate location within five miles.
(c) (i)  The division may recover from the bond, letter of credit, or
certificate of deposit the costs of collecting and distributing funds under
this section, up to 10% of the face value of the bond, letter of credit, or
certificate of deposit but only if the consumers have fully recovered their
damages first.
(ii)  The total liability of the issuer of the bond, letter of credit, or
certificate of deposit may not exceed the amount of the bond, letter of
credit, or certificate of deposit.
(iii)  The health spa shall maintain a bond, letter of credit, or certificate
of deposit in force for one year after it notifies the division in writing
that it has ceased all activities regulated by this chapter.
(d)  A health spa providing services at more than one location shall comply
with the requirements of Subsection (2)(a) for each separate location.
(e)  The division may impose a fine against a health spa that fails to comply
with the requirements of Subsection (2)(a) of up to $100 per day that the
health spa remains out of compliance.  All penalties received shall be
deposited into the Consumer Protection Education and Training Fund created in
Section 13-2-8.
(3) (a)  The minimum principal amount of the bond, letter of credit, or
certificate of credit required under Subsection (2) shall be based on the
number of unexpired contracts for health spa services to which the health spa
is a party, in accordance with the following schedule:
Principal Amount of                                             Number of
Contracts
Bond, Letter of Credit,
or Certificate of Deposit
$15,000                                                         500 or fewer
  35,000                                                                501 to
1,500
  50,000                                                                1,500
to 3,000
  75,000                                                                3,001
or more
(b)  A health spa that is not exempt under Section 13-23-6 shall comply with
Subsection (3)(a) with respect to all of the health spa's unexpired contracts
for health spa services, regardless of whether a portion of those contracts
satisfy the criteria in Section 13-23-6.
(4)  Each health spa shall obtain the bond, letter of credit, or certificate
of deposit and furnish a certified copy of the bond, letter of credit, or
certificate of deposit to the division prior to selling, offering or
attempting to sell, soliciting the sale of, or becoming a party to any
contract to provide health spa services.  A health spa is considered to be in
compliance with this section only if the proof provided to the division shows
that the bond, letter of credit, or certificate of credit is current.
(5)  Each health spa shall:
(a)  maintain accurate records of the bond, letter of credit, or certificate
of credit and of any payments made, due, or to become due to the issuer; and
(b)  open the records to inspection by the division at any time during normal
business hours.
(6)  If a health spa changes ownership, ceases operation, discontinues
facilities, or relocates and fails to offer an alternate location within five
miles within 30 days after its closing, the health spa is subject to the
requirements of this section as if it were a new health spa coming into being
at the time the health spa changed ownership.  The former owner may not
release, cancel, or terminate  the owner's liability under any bond, letter of
credit, or certificate of deposit previously filed with the division, unless:
(a)  the new owner has filed a new bond, letter of credit, or certificate of
deposit for the benefit of consumers covered under the previous owner's bond,
letter of credit, or certificate of deposit; or
(b)  the former owner has refunded all unearned payments to consumers.
(7)  If a health spa ceases operation or relocates and fails to offer an
alternative location within five miles, the health spa shall provide the
division with 45 days prior notice.
